Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-1] Definitions. For the
purposes of this chapter:

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Licensed respiratory therapist"
means a person:

(1) Who engages in the practice of respiratory care
and uses the title of licensed respiratory therapist;

(2) Who has been issued a license under this chapter;
and

(3) Whose license is in effect and not revoked,
suspended, or encumbered.

"Practice of respiratory care" means
providing assessment, therapy, management, rehabilitation, support services for
diagnostic evaluation, education, and care for patients with deficiencies and
abnormalities that affect the pulmonary system, including:

(1) Respiratory care services, including the
administration of pharmacological, diagnostic, and therapeutic care related to
respiratory care procedures necessary for treatment, disease prevention,
rehabilitative, or diagnostic regimens prescribed by a physician;

(2) Observation and monitoring of signs, symptoms,
reactions, and physical responses to respiratory care treatment and diagnostic
testing;

(3) Diagnostic or therapeutic use of:

(A) Medical gases, excluding general
anesthesia;

(B) Aerosols, humidification, environmental
control systems, or invasive and non-invasive modalities;

(C) Pharmacological care related to
respiratory care procedures;

(D) Mechanical or physiological ventilatory
support, including maintenance of natural airways and insertion and maintenance
of artificial airways;

(E) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and

(F) Respiratory protocol and evaluation or
diagnostic and testing techniques required for implementation of respiratory
care protocols; and

(4) The transcription and implementation of the
written, verbal, and telecommunicated orders of a physician pertaining to the
practice of respiratory care.

"Qualified medical direction" means
ready access by a respiratory therapist to a licensed physician who has
specialty training or experience in the management of acute and chronic
respiratory disorders and who is responsible for the quality, safety, and
appropriateness of the respiratory services provided by the respiratory
therapist. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next